apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="مەکک_ە__np">
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەی</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیەکی</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انی</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکەی</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکانی</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەیە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r>ە<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="بانە"><i>بان</i><par n="مەکک_ە__np"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆیە"><i>کۆی</i><par n="مەکک_ە__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سنە"><i>سن</i><par n="مەکک_ە__np"/></e>
      <e lm="هەڵەبجە"><i>هەڵەبج</i><par n="مەکک_ە__np"/></e>
      <e lm="مەککە"><i>مەکک</i><par n="مەکک_ە__np"/></e>
